Virginia statutes. Title 8.2. Commercial Code — Sales.
PART 3. General Obligation and Construction of Contract.

§ 8.2-301.
General obligations of parties.

The obligation of the seller is to transfer and deliver and that of the buyer is to accept and pay in accordance with the contract.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 21-23.

§ 8.2-302.
Unconscionable contract or clause.

If the court as a matter of law finds the contract or any clause of the contract to have been unconscionable at the time it was made the court may refuse to enforce the contract, or it may enforce the remainder of the contract without the unconscionable clause, or it may so limit the application of any unconscionable clause as to avoid any unconscionable result.

When it is claimed or appears to the court that the contract or any clause thereof may be unconscionable the parties shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to its commercial setting, purpose and effect to aid the court in making the determination.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For note, “Commercial Decency and The Code — The Doctrine of Unconscionability Vindicated,” see 9 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 1143 (1968).

For note discussing pre-judgment attachment in the context of consumer due process, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 337 (1972).

For note, “UCC Warranty Solutions to Art Fraud and Forgery,” see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 409 (1972).

For note, “Reforming the Law of Consumer Recovery and Enterprise Liability Through the Uniform Commercial Code,” see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1013 (1974).

For article, “Revamping Consumer-Credit Contract Law,” see 68 Va. L. Rev. 1333 (1982).

Research References.

Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 6. Pleading. § 6.03 Defendant’s Pleadings. Bryson.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 24 Contract Actions. § 24.04 Specific Performance. Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 2, 4, 11, 28, 31.

§ 8.2-303.
Allocation or division of risks.

Where this title allocates a risk or a burden as between the parties “unless otherwise agreed,” the agreement may not only shift the allocation but may also divide the risk or burden.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 19.

§ 8.2-304.
Price payable in money, goods, realty, or otherwise.

The price can be made payable in money or otherwise. If it is payable in whole or in part in goods each party is a seller of the goods which he is to transfer.

Even though all or part of the price is payable in an interest in realty the transfer of the goods and the seller’s obligations with reference to them are subject to this title, but not the transfer of the interest in realty or the transferor’s obligations in connection therewith.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 3, 23.

§ 8.2-305.
Open price term.

The parties if they so intend can conclude a contract for sale even though the price is not settled. In such a case the price is a reasonable price at the time for delivery if

nothing is said as to price; or

the price is left to be agreed by the parties and they fail to agree; or

the price is to be fixed in terms of some agreed market or other standard as set or recorded by a third person or agency and it is not so set or recorded.

A price to be fixed by the seller or by the buyer means a price for him to fix in good faith.

When a price left to be fixed otherwise than by agreement of the parties fails to be fixed through fault of one party the other may at his option treat the contract as cancelled or himself fix a reasonable price.

Where, however, the parties intend not to be bound unless the price be fixed or agreed and it is not fixed or agreed there is no contract. In such a case the buyer must return any goods already received or if unable so to do must pay their reasonable value at the time of delivery and the seller must return any portion of the price paid on account.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For article, “The Option Elements in Contracting,” see 90 Va. L. Rev. 2187 (2004).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 4, 12, 23, 32.

§ 8.2-306.
Output, requirements and exclusive dealings.

A term which measures the quantity by the output of the seller or the requirements of the buyer means such actual output or requirements as may occur in good faith, except that no quantity unreasonably disproportionate to any stated estimate or in the absence of a stated estimate to any normal or otherwise comparable prior output or requirements may be tendered or demanded.

A lawful agreement by either the seller or the buyer for exclusive dealing in the kind of goods concerned imposes unless otherwise agreed an obligation by the seller to use best efforts to supply the goods and by the buyer to use best efforts to promote their sale.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For article, “The Option Elements in Contracting,” see 90 Va. L. Rev. 2187 (2004).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 4, 12.

§ 8.2-307.
Delivery in single lot or several lots.

Unless otherwise agreed all goods called for by a contract for sale must be tendered in a single delivery and payment is due only on such tender but where the circumstances give either party the right to make or demand delivery in lots the price if it can be apportioned may be demanded for each lot.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 4, 12, 22, 23.

§ 8.2-308.
Absence of specified place for delivery.

Unless otherwise agreed

the place for delivery of goods is the seller’s place of business or if he has none his residence; but

in a contract for sale of identified goods which to the knowledge of the parties at the time of contracting are in some other place, that place is the place for their delivery; and

documents of title may be delivered through customary banking channels.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 12, 22.

§ 8.2-309.
Absence of specific time provisions; notice of termination.

The time for shipment or delivery or any other action under a contract if not provided in this title or agreed upon shall be a reasonable time.

Where the contract provides for successive performances but is indefinite in duration it is valid for a reasonable time but unless otherwise agreed may be terminated at any time by either party.

Termination of a contract by one party except on the happening of an agreed event requires that reasonable notification be received by the other party and an agreement dispensing with notification is invalid if its operation would be unconscionable.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 4, 8, 12, 22, 23.

§ 8.2-310.
Open time for payment or running of credit; authority to ship under reservation.

Unless otherwise agreed:

payment is due at the time and place at which the buyer is to receive the goods even though the place of shipment is the place of delivery; and

if the seller is authorized to send the goods he may ship them under reservation, and may tender the documents of title, but the buyer may inspect the goods after their arrival before payment is due unless such inspection is inconsistent with the terms of the contract (§

8.2-513

); and

if delivery is authorized and made by way of documents of title otherwise than by subsection (b) then payment is due regardless of where the goods are to be received (i) at the time and place at which the buyer is to receive delivery of the tangible documents or (ii) at the time the buyer is to receive delivery of the electronic documents and at the seller’s place of business or if none, the seller’s residence; and

where the seller is required or authorized to ship the goods on credit the credit period runs from the time of shipment but postdating the invoice or delaying its dispatch will correspondingly delay the starting of the credit period.

History.

1964, c. 219; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200 rewrote subdivision (c), which formerly read: “if delivery is authorized and made by way of documents of title otherwise than by subsection (b) then payment is due at the time and place at which the buyer is to receive the documents regardless of where the goods are to be received; and.”

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 4, 12.

§ 8.2-311.
Options and cooperation respecting performance.

An agreement for sale which is otherwise sufficiently definite (subsection (3) of §

8.2-204

) to be a contract is not made invalid by the fact that it leaves particulars of performance to be specified by one of the parties. Any such specification must be made in good faith and within limits set by commercial reasonableness.

Unless otherwise agreed specifications relating to assortment of the goods are at the buyer’s option and except as otherwise provided in subsections (1) (c) and (3) of §

8.2-319

specifications or arrangements relating to shipment are at the seller’s option.

Where such specification would materially affect the other party’s performance but is not seasonably made or where one party’s cooperation is necessary to the agreed performance of the other but is not seasonably forthcoming, the other party in addition to all other remedies

is excused for any resulting delay in his own performance; and

may also either proceed to perform in any reasonable manner or after the time for a material part of his own performance treat the failure to specify or to cooperate as a breach by failure to deliver or accept the goods.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 4, 12, 21, 22, 25.

§ 8.2-312.
Warranty of title and against infringement; buyer’s obligation against infringement.

Subject to subsection (2) there is in a contract for sale a warranty by the seller that

the title conveyed shall be good, and its transfer rightful; and

the goods shall be delivered free from any security interest or other lien or encumbrance of which the buyer at the time of contracting has no knowledge.

A warranty under subsection (1) will be excluded or modified only by specific language or by circumstances which give the buyer reason to know that the person selling does not claim title in himself or that he is purporting to sell only such right or title as he or a third person may have.

Unless otherwise agreed a seller who is a merchant regularly dealing in goods of the kind warrants that the goods shall be delivered free of the rightful claim of any third person by way of infringement or the like but a buyer who furnishes specifications to the seller must hold the seller harmless against any such claim which arises out of compliance with the specifications.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Research References.

Enforcement of Judgments and Liens in Virginia (Matthew Bender). 3. The Writ Firea Facies: Execution. § 3.6 Satisfaction of the Judgment; Sale of Tangible Property. Rendleman.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 16, 28, 32, 33; 5A M.J. Costs, § 7.

§ 8.2-313.
Express warranties by affirmation, promise, description, sample.

Express warranties by the seller are created as follows:

Any affirmation of fact or promise made by the seller to the buyer which relates to the goods and becomes part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the goods shall conform to the affirmation or promise.

Any description of the goods which is made part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the goods shall conform to the description.

Any sample or model which is made part of the basis of the bargain creates an express warranty that the whole of the goods shall conform to the sample or model.

It is not necessary to the creation of an express warranty that the seller use formal words such as “warrant” or “guarantee” or that he have a specific intention to make a warranty, but an affirmation merely of the value of the goods or a statement purporting to be merely the seller’s opinion or commendation of the goods does not create a warranty.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For note, “UCC Warranty Solutions to Art Fraud and Forgery,” see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 409 (1972).

For note, “Reforming the Law of Consumer Recovery and Enterprise Liability Through the Uniform Commercial Code,” see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1013 (1974).

For survey of Virginia commercial law for the year 1977-1978, see 64 Va. L. Rev. 1383 (1978).

For note on liability and warranties in consumer protection under the UCC, see 39 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1347 (1982).

For essay, “Proposed Legislation: A (Second) Modest Proposal to Protect Virginia Consumers Against Defective Products,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 19 (2008).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2B M.J. Automobiles, § 129; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 14, 17, 31.

§ 8.2-314.
Implied warranty: Merchantability; usage of trade.

Unless excluded or modified (§

8.2-316

), a warranty that the goods shall be merchantable is implied in a contract for their sale if the seller is a merchant with respect to goods of that kind. Under this section the serving for value of food or drink to be consumed either on the premises or elsewhere is a sale.

Goods to be merchantable must be at least such as

pass without objection in the trade under the contract description; and

in the case of fungible goods, are of fair average quality within the description; and

are fit for the ordinary purposes for which such goods are used; and

run, within the variations permitted by the agreement, of even kind, quality and quantity within each unit and among all units involved; and

are adequately contained, packaged, and labeled as the agreement may require; and

conform to the promises or affirmations of fact made on the container or label if any.

Unless excluded or modified (§

8.2-316

) other implied warranties may arise from course of dealing or usage of trade.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For article on products liability, see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 155 (1970).

For note, “UCC Warranty Solutions to Art Fraud and Forgery,” see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 409 (1972).

For note, “Reforming the Law of Consumer Recovery and Enterprise Liability Through the Uniform Commercial Code,” see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1013 (1974).

For comment, “A Guide to Federal Warranty Legislation — The Magnuson-Moss Act,” see 11 U. Rich. L. Rev. 163 (1976).

For comment, “Toward a Uniform State Product Liability Law — Virginia and the Uniform Product Liability Act,” see 36 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1145 (1979).

For note, “Virginia Should Adopt Strict Tort Recovery in Products Liability Suits Involving Personal Injury,” see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 391 (1980).

For article, “Products Liability and the Virginia Statute of Limitations — A Call for the Legislative Rescue Squad,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 323 (1982).

For note on liability and warranties in consumer protection under the UCC, see 39 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1347 (1982).

For 1987 survey of Virginia commercial law, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 693 (1987).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 3, 15, 17, 36; 8B M.J. Food, § 8.

§ 8.2-315.
Implied warranty: Fitness for particular purpose.

Where the seller at the time of contracting has reason to know any particular purpose for which the goods are required and that the buyer is relying on the seller’s skill or judgment to select or furnish suitable goods, there is unless excluded or modified under the next section [§

8.2-316

] an implied warranty that the goods shall be fit for such purpose.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For article on products liability, see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 155 (1970).

For note, “UCC Warranty Solutions to Art Fraud and Forgery,” see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 409 (1972).

For note, “Reforming the Law of Consumer Recovery and Enterprise Liability Through the Uniform Commercial Code,” see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1013 (1974).

For survey of developments in Virginia commercial law for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1475 (1974).

For comment, “A Guide to Federal Warranty Legislation — The Magnuson-Moss Act,” see 11 U. Rich. L. Rev. 163 (1976).

For note on liability and warranties in consumer protection under the UCC, see 39 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1347 (1982).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 29 Consumer Actions and Products Liability. § 29.02 Products Liability.
Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2B M.J. Automobiles, § 129; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 14, 17, 31.

§ 8.2-316.
Exclusion or modification of warranties.

Words or conduct relevant to the creation of an express warranty and words or conduct tending to negate or limit warranty shall be construed wherever reasonable as consistent with each other; but subject to the provisions of this title on parol or extrinsic evidence (§

8.2-202

) negation or limitation is inoperative to the extent that such construction is unreasonable.

Subject to subsection (3), to exclude or modify the implied warranty of merchantability or any part of it the language must mention merchantability and in case of a writing must be conspicuous, and to exclude or modify any implied warranty of fitness the exclusion must be by a writing and conspicuous. Language to exclude all implied warranties of fitness is sufficient if it states, for example, that “There are no warranties which extend beyond the description on the face hereof.”

Notwithstanding subsection (2)

unless the circumstances indicate otherwise, all implied warranties are excluded by expressions like “as is,” “with all faults” or other language which in common understanding calls the buyer’s attention to the exclusion of warranties and makes plain that there is no implied warranty; and

when the buyer before entering into the contract has examined the goods or the sample or model as fully as he desired or has refused to examine the goods there is no implied warranty with regard to defects which an examination ought in the circumstances to have revealed to him; and

an implied warranty can also be excluded or modified by course of dealing or course of performance or usage of trade.

Remedies for breach of warranty can be limited in accordance with the provisions of this title on liquidation or limitation of damages and on contractual modification of remedy (§§

8.2-718

and

8.2-719

).

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For comment on impact of Uniform Commercial Code upon implied warranties in leases, see 26 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 374 (1969).

For note, “UCC Warranty Solutions to Art Fraud and Forgery,” see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 409 (1972).

For note, “Reforming the Law of Consumer Recovery and Enterprise Liability Through the Uniform Commercial Code,” see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1013 (1974).

For survey of developments in Virginia commercial law for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1475 (1974).

For comment, “A Guide to Federal Warranty Legislation — The Magnuson-Moss Act,” see 11 U. Rich. L. Rev. 163 (1976).

For note, “Legal Control on Warranty Liability Limitation Under the Uniform Commercial Code,” see 63 Va. L. Rev. 791 (1977).

For comment, “Toward a Uniform State Product Liability Law — Virginia and the Uniform Product Liability Act,” see 36 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1145 (1979).

For note on liability and warranties in consumer protection under the UCC, see 39 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1347 (1982).

For essay, “Proposed Legislation: A (Second) Modest Proposal to Protect Virginia Consumers Against Defective Products,” see 43 U. Rich. L. Rev. 19 (2008).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2B M.J. Automobiles, § 129; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 14, 17, 31.

§ 8.2-317.
Cumulation and conflict of warranties express or implied.

Warranties whether express or implied shall be construed as consistent with each other and as cumulative, but if such construction is unreasonable the intention of the parties shall determine which warranty is dominant. In ascertaining that intention the following rules apply:

Exact or technical specifications displace an inconsistent sample or model or general language of description.

A sample from an existing bulk displaces inconsistent general language of description.

Express warranties displace inconsistent implied warranties other than an implied warranty of fitness for a particular purpose.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Law Review.

For comment, “A Guide to Federal Warranty Legislation — The Magnuson-Moss Act,” see 11 U. Rich. L. Rev. 163 (1976).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 13.

§ 8.2-317.1.
Use of warranty registration cards.

As used in this section, “warranty registration card” means a card or similar device that is provided to the purchaser of personal, family, or household goods with a statement that the purchaser’s return of the warranty registration card shortly after purchase of the goods is a condition precedent to warranty coverage and performance.

Unless any requirement that the purchaser of personal, family, or household goods return a warranty registration card as a condition precedent to warranty coverage and performance is conspicuously disclosed in any advertising and marketing materials that reference the goods’ warranty, a seller may not condition the coverage or performance of a warranty upon the return by the purchaser of a warranty registration card, or provide that the duration of a warranty is dependent upon the return by the purchaser of a warranty registration card.

This section does not prohibit the use of warranty registration cards where a seller suggests use of the card as one possible means of proof of the date the goods were purchased. Any such suggestion to the purchaser shall include notice that failure to return the card will not affect rights under the warranty, if the purchaser can establish with reasonable certainty the date the goods were purchased.

A violation of this section constitutes a prohibited practice under the Virginia Consumer Protection Act (§ 59.1-196 et seq.).

History.

2010, c. 713.

§ 8.2-318.
When lack of privity no defense in action against manufacturer or seller of goods.

Lack of privity between plaintiff and defendant shall be no defense in any action brought against the manufacturer or seller of goods to recover damages for breach of warranty, express or implied, or for negligence, although the plaintiff did not purchase the goods from the defendant, if the plaintiff was a person whom the manufacturer or seller might reasonably have expected to use, consume, or be affected by the goods; however, this section shall not be construed to affect any litigation pending on June 29, 1962.

History.

Code 1950, § 8-654.3; 1962, c. 476; 1964, c. 219.

Editor’s note.

Section 8-654.3, Code 1950, was substituted for the first alternative version of this section appearing in the official text of the Uniform Commercial Code, which read as follows:

“§ 2-318. Third Party Beneficiaries of Warranties Express or Implied. A seller’s warranty whether express or implied extends to any natural person who is in the family or household of his buyer or who is a guest in his home if it is reasonable to expect that such person may use, consume or be affected by the goods and who is injured in person by breach of the warranty. A seller may not exclude or limit the operation of this section.”

Section 8-654.3, referred to in the Virginia Comment, was repealed by Acts 1977, c. 617.

Law Review.

For article on products liability under the Uniform Commercial Code, see 51 Va. L. Rev. 804 (1965).

For comment on tort action for strict liability in products liability cases, see 26 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 143 (1969).

For article on products liability, see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 155 (1970).

For note discussing Virginia’s disavowal of privity of contract in commercial transactions as a basis for extended liability, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 409 (1972).

For note, “Reforming the Law of Consumer Recovery and Enterprise Liability Through the Uniform Commercial Code,” see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1013 (1974).

For comment, “Toward a Uniform State Product Liability Law — Virginia and the Uniform Product Liability Act,” see 36 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1145 (1979).

For note, “Virginia Should Adopt Strict Tort Recovery in Products Liability Suits Involving Personal Injury,” see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 391 (1980).

For article, “Products Liability and the Virginia Statute of Limitations — A Call for the Legislative Rescue Squad,” see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 323 (1982).

For note on liability and warranties in consumer protection under the UCC, see 39 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1347 (1982).

For note on enforcing waivers in products liability, see 69 Va. L. Rev. 1111 (1983).

For 1987 survey of Virginia commercial law, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 693 (1987).

For survey on commercial law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 523 (1989).

For survey on construction law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 541 (1989).

For article reviewing case law and changes in legislation affecting Virginia construction law, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 143 (2005).

For casenote and comment, “The Fourth Circuit Sinks Admiral Dur’s Boat and Virginia’s Economic Loss Rule Insulates a Negligent Subcontractor from Tort Liability,” see 16 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 747 (2009).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 29 Consumer Actions and Products Liability. § 29.02 Products Liability.
Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2B M.J. Automobiles, § 132; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 13, 99; 4A M.J. Contracts, § 80; 5C M.J. Death by Wrongful Act, § 10; 8B M.J. Food, §§ 6-9; 13B M.J. Negligence, § 14.

§ 8.2-319.
F.O.B. and F.A.S. terms.

Unless otherwise agreed the term F.O.B. (which means “free on board”) at a named place, even though used only in connection with the stated price, is a delivery term under which

when the term is F.O.B. the place of shipment, the seller must at that place ship the goods in the manner provided in this title (§

8.2-504

) and bear the expense and risk of putting them into the possession of the carrier; or

when the term is F.O.B. the place of destination, the seller must at his own expense and risk transport the goods to that place and there tender delivery of them in the manner provided in this title (§

8.2-503

):

when under either (a) or (b) the term is also F.O.B. vessel, car or other vehicle, the seller must in addition at his own expense and risk load the goods on board. If the term is F.O.B. vessel the buyer must name the vessel and in an appropriate case the seller must comply with the provisions of this title on the form of bill of lading (§

8.2-323

).

Unless otherwise agreed the term F.A.S. vessel (which means “free alongside”) at a named port, even though used only in connection with the stated price, is a delivery term under which the seller must

at his own expense and risk deliver the goods alongside the vessel in the manner usual in that port or on a dock designated and provided by the buyer; and

obtain and tender a receipt for the goods in exchange for which the carrier is under a duty to issue a bill of lading.

Unless otherwise agreed in any case falling within subsection (1) (a) or (c) or subsection (2) the buyer must seasonably give any needed instructions for making delivery, including when the term is F.A.S. or F.O.B. the loading berth of the vessel and in an appropriate case its name and sailing date. The seller may treat the failure of needed instructions as a failure of cooperation under this title (§

8.2-311

). He may also at his option move the goods in any reasonable manner preparatory to delivery or shipment.

Under the term F.O.B. vessel or F.A.S. unless otherwise agreed the buyer must make payment against tender of the required documents and the seller may not tender nor the buyer demand delivery of the goods in substitution for the documents.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 12, 21, 23.

§ 8.2-320.
C.I.F. and C. & F. terms.

The term C.I.F. means that the price includes in a lump sum the cost of the goods and the insurance and freight to the named destination. The term C. & F. or C.F. means that the price so includes cost and freight to the named destination.

Unless otherwise agreed and even though used only in connection with the stated price and destination, the term C.I.F. destination or its equivalent requires the seller at his own expense and risk to

put the goods into the possession of a carrier at the port for shipment and obtain a negotiable bill or bills of lading covering the entire transportation to the named destination; and

load the goods and obtain a receipt from the carrier (which may be contained in the bill of lading) showing that the freight has been paid or provided for; and

obtain a policy or certificate of insurance, including any war risk insurance, of a kind and on terms then current at the port of shipment in the usual amount, in the currency of the contract, shown to cover the same goods covered by the bill of lading and providing for payment of loss to the order of the buyer or for the account of whom it may concern; but the seller may add to the price the amount of the premium for any such war risk insurance; and

prepare an invoice of the goods and procure any other documents required to effect shipment or to comply with the contract; and

forward and tender with commercial promptness all the documents in due form and with any endorsement necessary to perfect the buyer’s rights.

Unless otherwise agreed the term C. & F. or its equivalent has the same effect and imposes upon the seller the same obligations and risks as a C.I.F. term except the obligation as to insurance.

Under the term C.I.F. or C. & F. unless otherwise agreed the buyer must make payment against tender of the required documents and the seller may not tender nor the buyer demand delivery of the goods in substitution for the documents.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 12.

§ 8.2-321.
C.I.F. or C. & F.: “Net landed weights”; “payment on arrival”; warranty of condition on arrival.

Under a contract containing a term C.I.F. or C. & F.

Where the price is based on or is to be adjusted according to “net landed weights,” “delivered weights,” “out turn” quantity or quality or the like, unless otherwise agreed the seller must reasonably estimate the price. The payment due on tender of the documents called for by the contract is the amount so estimated, but after final adjustment of the price a settlement must be made with commercial promptness.

An agreement described in subsection (1) or any warranty of quality or condition of the goods on arrival places upon the seller the risk of ordinary deterioration, shrinkage and the like in transportation but has no effect on the place or time of identification to the contract for sale or delivery or on the passing of the risk of loss.

Unless otherwise agreed where the contract provides for payment on or after arrival of the goods the seller must before payment allow such preliminary inspection as is feasible; but if the goods are lost delivery of the documents and payment are due when the goods should have arrived.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 12.

§ 8.2-322.
Delivery “ex-ship.”

Unless otherwise agreed a term for delivery of goods “ex-ship” (which means from the carrying vessel) or in equivalent language is not restricted to a particular ship and requires delivery from a ship which has reached a place at the named port of destination where goods of the kind are are usually discharged.

Under such a term unless otherwise agreed

the seller must discharge all liens arising out of the carriage and furnish the buyer with a direction which puts the carrier under a duty to deliver the goods; and

the risk of loss does not pass to the buyer until the goods leave the ship’s tackle or are otherwise properly unloaded.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 12, 19.

§ 8.2-323.
Form of bill of lading required in overseas shipment; “Overseas.”

Where the contract contemplates overseas shipment and contains a term C.I.F. or C. & F. or F.O.B. vessel, the seller unless otherwise agreed must obtain a negotiable bill of lading stating that the goods have been loaded on board or, in the case of a term C.I.F. or C. & F., received for shipment.

Where in a case within subsection (1) a tangible bill of lading has been issued in a set of parts, unless otherwise agreed if the documents are not to be sent from abroad the buyer may demand tender of the full set; otherwise only one part of the bill of lading need be tendered. Even if the agreement expressly requires a full set:

due tender of a single part is acceptable within the provisions of this title on cure of improper delivery (subsection (1) of §

8.2-508

); and

even though the full set is demanded, if the documents are sent from abroad the person tendering an incomplete set may nevertheless require payment upon furnishing an indemnity which the buyer in good faith deems adequate.

A shipment by water or by air or a contract contemplating such shipment is “overseas” insofar as by usage of trade or agreement it is subject to the commercial, financing or shipping practices characteristic of international deep water commerce.

History.

1964, c. 219; 2004, c. 200.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 200 inserted “tangible” in the first sentence of subsection (2).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 12, 22.

§ 8.2-324.
“No arrival, no sale” term.

Under a term “no arrival, no sale” or terms of like meaning, unless otherwise agreed,

the seller must properly ship conforming goods and if they arrive by any means he must tender them on arrival but he assumes no obligation that the goods will arrive unless he has caused the non-arrival; and

where without fault of the seller the goods are in part lost or have so deteriorated as no longer to conform to the contract or arrive after the contract time, the buyer may proceed as if there had been casualty to identified goods (§

8.2-613

).

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 12, 19, 30.

§ 8.2-325.
“Letter of credit” term; “confirmed credit.”

Failure of the buyer seasonably to furnish an agreed letter of credit is a breach of the contract for sale.

The delivery to seller of a proper letter of credit suspends the buyer’s obligation to pay. If the letter of credit is dishonored, the seller may on seasonable notification to the buyer require payment directly from him.

Unless otherwise agreed the term “letter of credit” or “banker’s credit” in a contract for sale means an irrevocable credit issued by a financing agency of good repute and, where the shipment is overseas, of good international repute. The term “confirmed credit” means that the credit must also carry the direct obligation of such an agency which does business in the seller’s financial market.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 12.

§ 8.2-326.
Sale on approval and sale or return; rights of creditors.

Unless otherwise agreed, if delivered goods may be returned by the buyer even though they conform to the contract, the transaction is

a “sale on approval” if the goods are delivered primarily for use; and

a “sale or return” if the goods are delivered primarily for resale.

Goods held on approval are not subject to the claims of the buyer’s creditors until acceptance; goods held on sale or return are subject to such claims while in the buyer’s possession.

Any “or return” term of a contract for sale is to be treated as a separate contract for sale within the statute of frauds section of this title (§

8.2-201

) and as contradicting the sale aspect of the contract within the provisions of this title on parol or extrinsic evidence (§

8.2-202

).

History.

1964, c. 219; 2000, c. 1007.

Editor’s note.

Section 55-152, referred to in the Virginia Comment, was repealed by Acts 1973, c. 509.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 1007, effective July 1, 2001, deleted “consignment sales and” from catchline, and deleted “Except as provided in subsection (3),” at the beginning of subsection (2); deleted former subsection (3), explaining the status of “sale or return”, and redesignated former subsection (4) as present subsection (3).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Agency, § 89; 2B M.J. Bankruptcy, § 60; 3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 12, 18, 20.

§ 8.2-327.
Special incidents of sale on approval and sale or return.

Under a sale on approval unless otherwise agreed

although the goods are identified to the contract the risk of loss and the title do not pass to the buyer until acceptance; and

use of the goods consistent with the purpose of trial is not acceptance but failure seasonably to notify the seller of election to return the goods is acceptance, and if the goods conform to the contract acceptance of any part is acceptance of the whole; and

after due notification of election to return, the return is at the seller’s risk and expense but a merchant buyer must follow any reasonable instructions.

Under a sale or return unless otherwise agreed

the option to return extends to the whole or any commercial unit of the goods while in substantially their original condition, but must be exercised seasonably; and

the return is at the buyer’s risk and expense.

History.

1964, c. 219.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, §§ 12, 18, 19, 26.